Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-1976
Removal of designated or appointed directors.

(a) A designated director may be removed by an amendment to the articles or bylaws deleting or changing the designation.

(b)(1) An appointed director may be removed without cause by the person appointing the director except as otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws;

(2) The person removing the appointed director shall do so by giving written notice of the removal to the appointed director and either the presiding officer of the board or the corporation's president or secretary; and

(3) A removal of an appointed director is effective when the notice is effective unless the notice specifies a future effective date.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 76.